Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,118
Commission; quorum.

Five members of the commission shall constitute a quorum and the concurrence of five members of the commission shall be required for any action or recommendation of the commission or any sanction which may be imposed pursuant to section 49-14,126.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 118;

Laws 1990, LB 534, § 8.